Utah statutes.
17-15-22.   Federal entitlement lands -- In-lieu payments -- Allocation -- Agreements with political subdivisions.

Any county may use any amounts it receives from the United States as in-lieu payments under P.L. 94-565 (90 Stat. 2662) for any governmental purpose in the county, and may share these revenues with cities, towns, or any other political subdivision within its jurisdiction. The county may contract with these political subdivisions as to how these amounts may be allocated and used.

